Arkansas, session 2025, HB1190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-317. Wages from teaching — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "teacher" means a person who is:
(1) Engaged in student instruction in kindergarten through grade
twelve (K-12) for more than seventy percent (70%) of the person's contracted
or employed time; and
(2) Employed by a:
(A) Public school in a teaching, instructional, or
educational capacity that requires a license under § 6-17-401 et seq.; or
(B) Open-enrollment charter school in a teaching,
instructional, or educational capacity.
(b) There is allowed an exemption from the income tax imposed by this
chapter for the first fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of wages received by
an individual for employment as a teacher.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
*JLL119*
01/21/2025 4:22:02 PM JLL119

HB1190
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.



































01/21/2025 4:22:02 PM JLL119